Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-2906
Department of Agriculture; State Department of Education; cooperation.

The Department of Agriculture and the State Department of Education shall cooperate in administering the program and shall each provide professional consultation and staff support.

Laws 2021, LB396, § 6.